nb: Grepstil på håndtak for slagverkskølle: Bart (uten grep); Korkgrep; Skumgrep; Riflet; Lakkert/behandlet; Gummibelagt grep; Tapet/surret grep; Annet
el: Κρουστικό σφυρί λαβής (προσδιοριστικό οντότητας) στυλ λαβής: Γυμνή (χωρίς λαβή); Λαβή από φελλό; Λαβή από αφρώδες υλικό; Τραχιά (knurled); Λακαρισμένη/με φινίρισμα; Λαβή από καουτσούκ; Λαβή με ταινία/περιτύλιγμα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Perkusinės lazdelės rankenos sukibimo tipas: Be dangos (be suėmimo dalies); Kamštinė danga; Poroloninė danga; Rievėtas; Lakuotas / apdorotas; Gumuota danga; Apvyniotas juosta; Kita
fr: Type de revêtement de prise du manche de mailloche de percussion: Nu (sans grip); Grip en liège; Grip en mousse; Moleté; Laqué/fini; Grip caoutchouté; Grip ruban/enveloppant; Autre
de: Griffstil des Schlagschlägels: Blank (kein Griff); Korkgriff; Schaumstoffgriff; Gerändelt; Lackiert/behandelt; Gummierter Griff; Griffband/Wickel; Sonstige
zh-CN: 打击乐槌手柄握把样式: 裸柄（无握把）; 软木握把; 泡棉握把; 滚花; 漆面/涂层; 橡胶握把; 绑带/缠绕握把; 其他
pt-PT: Identificador de baqueta de percussão estilo de pega: Sem revestimento (sem aderência); Aderência em cortiça; Aderência em espuma; Serrilhado; Lacado/com acabamento; Aderência em borracha; Aderência em fita/envoltório; Outro
ko: 타악기 망치 손잡이 그립 방식: 베어(그립 없음); 코르크 그립; 폼 그립; 널링 처리; 래커/마감 처리; 고무 처리 그립; 테이프/랩 그립; 기타
fi: Lyömäsoittimen nuijan varren otepinta: Paljas (ei grippiä); Korkkigrippi; Vaahtomuovigrippi; Rihletty; Lakattu/viimeistelty; Kuminen grippi; Teipattu/kiedottu grippi; Muu
hr-HR: Stil drške čekića za udaraljke: Golo (bez drške); Pluteni rukohvat; Pjenasti rukohvat; Narebreno; Lakirano/dovršeno; Gumirani rukohvat; Rukohvat omotan trakom; Ostalo
ja: パーカッションマレットのハンドルグリップスタイル: ベア（グリップなし）; コルクグリップ; フォームグリップ; ローレット加工; ラッカー/仕上げ; ラバーグリップ; テープ/ラップグリップ; その他
tr: Vurmalı tokmak sap kavrama stili: Kaplamasız (tutaçsız); Mantar tutaç; Köpük tutaç; Tırtıllı; Cilalı/işlem görmüş; Kauçuk tutaç; Bantlı/sargılı tutaç; Diğer
es: Estilo de agarre de la empuñadura del mazo de percusión: Liso (sin agarre); Agarre de corcho; Agarre de espuma; Estriado; Lacado/acabado; Agarre de goma; Agarre con cinta/envoltura; Otro
en: Percussion mallet handle grip style: Bare (no grip); Cork grip; Foam grip; Knurled; Lacquered/finished; Rubberized grip; Tape/wrap grip; Other
pt-BR: Percussão baqueta cabo estilo de empunhadura: Liso (sem revestimento); Revestimento em cortiça; Revestimento em espuma; Recartilhado; Envernizado/com acabamento; Revestimento emborrachado; Revestimento com fita; Outro
bg-BG: Тип захват на дръжката на палка за ударни инструменти: Без покритие (без грип); Корков захват; Захват от пяна; Набразден; Лакиран/с покритие; Гумиран захват; Захват с лента/обвивка; Друг
da: Stil for perkussionkølles håndtagsgreb: Bar (intet greb); Korkgreb; Skumgreb; Riflet; Lakeret/behandlet; Gummigreb; Tape/viklet greb; Andet
cs: Styl úchopu rukojeti perkusní paličky: Hladký (bez rukojeti); Korková rukojeť; Pěnová rukojeť; Vroubkovaný; Lakovaný/povrchově upravený; Pogumovaná rukojeť; Omotávka; Ostatní
ru: Стиль рукоятки молоточка: Гладкая (без грипа); Пробковая ручка; Ручка из пеноматериала; Рифленая; Лакированная/с покрытием; Прорезиненная ручка; В обмотке (лентой); Другое
ro-RO: Stil de prindere al mânerului bețelor de percuție: Simplu (fără manșon de prindere); Prindere din plută; Prindere din spumă; Striat; Lăcuit/finisat; Prindere cauciucată; Prindere cu bandă/învelită; Altele
zh-TW: 打擊樂器槌柄握把款式: 無握把 (無防滑); 軟木握把; 泡棉握把; 滾花; 上漆/表面處理; 橡膠握把; 膠帶/纏繞式握把; 其他
sl-SI: Stil ročaja/oprijema tolkalne palice: Golo (brez oprijema); Ročaj iz plute; Ročaj iz pene; Narebričeno; Lakirano/končno obdelano; Gumiran ročaj; Ovit ročaj (trak); Drugo
th: รูปแบบการพันด้ามจับของไม้ตีกระทบ: ไม่มีที่จับ; ด้ามจับไม้ก๊อก; ด้ามจับโฟม; ลายกันลื่น; เคลือบแลคเกอร์/ขัดเงา; ด้ามจับหุ้มยาง; พันเทป/วัสดุห่อหุ้ม; อื่นๆ
hu: Ütőhangszeres verő nyélmarkolatának típusa: Csupasz (markolat nélkül); Parafa markolat; Szivacs markolat; Recézett; Lakkozott / felületkezelt; Gumírozott markolat; Szalag / tekercselt markolat; Egyéb
sv: Handtagsgreppstil för slagverksklubba: Bar (utan grepp); Korkgrepp; Skumgrepp; Lettrad; Lackerad/behandlad; Gummerat grepp; Tejpat/lindat grepp; Övrigt
it: Stile dell'impugnatura del martello per percussioni: Senza rivestimento (nessuna impugnatura); Impugnatura in sughero; Impugnatura in schiuma; Zigrinato; Laccato/rifinito; Impugnatura gommata; Impugnatura con nastro; Altro
vi: Kiểu cầm cán dùi gõ: Trơn (không có chuôi); Chuôi bần; Chuôi mút xốp; Có khía; Sơn mài/đánh bóng; Chuôi bọc cao su; Chuôi quấn băng dính/băng bọc; Khác
pl: Styl chwytu trzonka pałki perkusyjnej: Surowy (bez owijki); Uchwyt korkowy; Uchwyt piankowy; Radełkowany; Lakierowany/wykończony; Uchwyt gumowany; Owijka/taśma; Inne
sk-SK: Štýl úchopu/rukoväte paličiek na perkusie: Holý (bez úchopu); Korkový úchop; Penový úchop; Vrúbkovaný; Lakovaný/s povrchovou úpravou; Pogumovaný úchop; Úchop omotaný páskou; Iné
nl: Percussiestok handgreep gripstijl: Kaal (geen grip); Kurken grip; Schuimen grip; Gekarteld; Gelakt/afgewerkt; Rubberen grip; Grip met tape/wikkel; Overig